Florida, session 2026, SB1726.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 161 162 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âReal Affordable 163 Housing Relief Act.â 164 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 125.0103, Florida 165 Statutes, is amended to read: 166 125.0103âOrdinances and rules imposing price controls.â 167 (2)âA municipality, county, or other entity of local 168 government may not adopt or maintain in effect any law, 169 ordinance, rule, or other measure that would have the effect of 170 imposing controls on rents. 171 Section 3.âSubsection (2) of section 166.043, Florida 172 Statutes, is amended to read: 173 166.043âOrdinances and rules imposing price controls.â 174 (2)âA municipality, county, or other entity of local 175 government may not adopt or maintain in effect any law, 176 ordinance, rule, or other measure that would have the effect of 177 imposing controls on rents. 178 Section 4.âSection 166.0452, Florida Statutes, is created 179 to read: 180 166.0452âCommunity Land Bank Program.â 181 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 182 (a)ââAffordableâ has the same meaning as in s. 420.0004. 183 (b)ââCommunity housing development organizationâ has the 184 same meaning as in s. 420.503. 185 (c)ââCommunity land bank planâ or âplanâ means a plan 186 adopted by the governing body of a county or municipality to 187 implement a community land bank program. 188 (d)ââCommunity land bank programâ or âprogramâ means the 189 program created by a governing body of a county or municipality 190 under this section. 191 (e)ââLand bankâ means an entity established or approved by 192 the governing body of a county or municipality for the purpose 193 of acquiring, holding, and transferring unimproved real property 194 under this section. 195 (f)ââLow-income householdâ has the same meaning as in s. 196 420.9071. 197 (g)ââQualified organizationâ means a community housing 198 development organization that meets all of the following 199 criteria: 200 1.âContains within its designated geographical boundaries 201 of operation, as set forth in its application for certification 202 filed with and approved by the county or municipality, a portion 203 of the property that a land bank is offering for sale. 204 2.âHas built at least three single-family homes or duplexes 205 or one multifamily residential dwelling of four or more housing 206 units in compliance with all applicable building codes within 207 the preceding 2-year period and within the organizationâs 208 designated geographical boundaries of operation. 209 3.âHas developed or rehabilitated housing units within the 210 preceding 3-year period which are within a 2-mile radius of the 211 property that a land bank is offering for sale. 212 (h)ââQualified participating developerâ means a developer 213 that meets all of the following criteria: 214 1.âHas developed three or more housing units within the 3 215 year period preceding its submission of a proposal to the land 216 bank seeking to acquire real property from a land bank. 217 2.âHas a development plan approved by the governing body of 218 the county or municipality for the property acquired from a land 219 bank. 220 3.âAny other requirements adopted by the governing body of 221 the county or municipality in its community land bank plan. 222 223 The term includes a qualified organization. 224 (i)ââVery-low-income householdâ has the same meaning as in 225 s. 420.9071. 226 (2)âThe governing body of a county or municipality may 227 create a community land bank program in which the person charged 228 with selling real property pursuant to a foreclosure judgment 229 may sell certain eligible real property by private sale for 230 purposes of affordable housing developments. The governing body 231 of a county or municipality that adopts a community land bank 232 program shall establish or approve a land bank for the purpose 233 of acquiring, holding, and transferring unimproved real property 234 under this section. 235 (3)(a)âThe governing body of a county or municipality that 236 creates a community land bank program shall operate the program 237 in conformance with a community land bank plan that the county 238 or municipality adopts annually. The plan may be amended as 239 needed. 240 (b)âIn developing the plan, the governing body of a county 241 or municipality shall consider other housing plans adopted by 242 the governing body, including the comprehensive plan submitted 243 to the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development 244 and all fair housing plans and policies adopted or agreed to by 245 the governing body. 246 (c)âThe plan must include, at a minimum, all of the 247 following: 248 1.âA list of community housing development organizations 249 eligible to participate in the right of first refusal under 250 subsection (6). The plan must also include the time period 251 during which the right of first refusal may be exercised, which 252 time period must be at least 9 months but not more than 26 253 months after the date of the deed of conveyance of the property 254 to the land bank. 255 2.âA right of first refusal for any other nonprofit 256 corporation exempted from federal income tax under s. 501(c)(3) 257 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, provided that the 258 preeminent right of first refusal is provided to qualified 259 organizations as provided in subsection (6). 260 3.âA list of the parcels of real property that may be 261 eligible for sale to the land bank during the next year. 262 4.âThe countyâs or municipalityâs plan for the development 263 of affordable housing on those parcels of real property. 264 5.âThe sources and amounts of money the county or 265 municipality anticipates to be available for subsidies for the 266 development of affordable housing in the county or municipality, 267 including any money specifically available for housing developed 268 under the program, as approved by the governing body of the 269 county or municipality at the time the plan is adopted. 270 6.âThe amount of additional time, if any, that a property 271 may be held in the land bank once an offer has been received 272 from a qualified participating developer and accepted by the 273 land bank. 274 (4)(a)âBefore the adoption of a plan, the governing body of 275 a county or municipality must hold a public hearing on the 276 proposed plan. 277 (b)âThe county or city manager, or his or her designee, 278 must provide notice of the public hearing to all community 279 housing development organizations and to the neighborhood 280 associations identified by the governing body of the county or 281 municipality as serving the neighborhoods in which properties 282 anticipated to be available for sale to the land bank under this 283 section are located. 284 (c)âThe county or city manager, or his or her designee, 285 must make copies of the proposed plan available to the public at 286 least 60 days before the date of the public hearing. 287 (5)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (f), property that 288 is ordered sold pursuant to a foreclosure judgment may be sold 289 in a private sale to a land bank by the person charged with the 290 sale of the property without first offering the property for 291 sale as otherwise provided in chapter 45 if all of the following 292 apply: 293 1.âThe market value of the property as specified in the 294 judgment of foreclosure is less than the total amount due under 295 the judgment, including all taxes, penalties, and interest, plus 296 the value of nontax liens held by a taxing unit and awarded by 297 the judgment, court costs, and the cost of the sale. 298 2.âThe property is not improved with a building or 299 buildings. 300 3.âThere are delinquent taxes on the property for a total 301 of at least 5 years. 302 4.âThe governing body of the county or municipality has 303 executed an interlocal agreement with the other taxing units 304 that are parties to the foreclosure proceeding which enables 305 those taxing units to agree to participate in the program while 306 retaining the right to withhold consent to the sale of the 307 specific properties to the land bank. 308 (b)âA sale of property for use in connection with the 309 program is a sale for a public purpose. 310 (c)âIf the person being sued in a foreclosure proceeding 311 does not contest the market value of the property in the 312 proceeding, the person waives the right to challenge the amount 313 of the market value determined by the court for purposes of the 314 sale of the property under s. 45.031. 315 (d)âFor any sale of property under this section, the person 316 charged with the sale of the property must provide each person 317 who was a defendant to the judgment, or that personâs attorney, 318 written notice at least 90 days before the date of the sale of 319 the proposed method of sale of the property. Such notice must be 320 given in accordance with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. 321 (e)âAfter receipt of the notice required under paragraph 322 (d) and before the date of the proposed sale, the owner of the 323 property subject to the sale may file with the person charged 324 with the sale a written request that the property not be sold in 325 the manner provided under this section. 326 (f)âIf the person charged with the sale receives a written 327 request as provided in paragraph (e), the person must sell the 328 property as otherwise provided in chapter 45. 329 (g)âThe owner of the property subject to the sale may not 330 receive any proceeds of a sale under this section and does not 331 have any personal liability for a deficiency of the judgment as 332 a result of a sale under this section. 333 (h)âIf consent is given by the taxing units that are a 334 party to the judgment, property may be sold to a land bank for 335 less than the market value of the property as specified in the 336 judgment or less than the total of all taxes, penalties, and 337 interest, plus the value of nontax liens held by a taxing unit 338 and awarded by the judgment, court costs, and the cost of the 339 sale. 340 (i)âThe deed of conveyance of the property sold to a land 341 bank under this section conveys to the land bank the right, 342 title, and interest in the property acquired or held by each 343 taxing unit that was a party to the judgment, subject to the 344 right of redemption. 345 (6)âAfter receiving the deed of conveyance of the property, 346 a land bank must first offer the property for sale to qualified 347 organizations. 348 (a)âA land bank must provide notice to qualified 349 organizations by certified mail, return receipt requested, at 350 least 60 days before the beginning of the time period in which a 351 right of first refusal may be exercised according to a countyâs 352 or municipalityâs community land bank plan. 353 (b)âIf a land bank conveys the property to a qualified 354 organization before the expiration of the time period specified 355 by the community land bank plan, the interlocal agreement 356 executed under subparagraph (5)(a)4. must provide tax abatement 357 for the property until the expiration of the time period. 358 (c)âDuring the right of first refusal time period, a land 359 bank may not sell the property to a qualified participating 360 developer other than a qualified organization. If all qualified 361 organizations notify the land bank that they are declining to 362 exercise their right of first refusal during the applicable time 363 period, the land bank may sell the property to any other 364 qualified participating developer at the same price that the 365 land bank offered the property to the qualified organizations. 366 (d)âIf more than one qualified organization expresses an 367 interest in exercising its right of first refusal, the 368 organization that has the most geographically compact area 369 encompassing a portion of the property as designated in its 370 application for certification is given priority. 371 (e)âA land bank is not required to provide a right of first 372 refusal to qualified organizations under this section if the 373 land bank is selling property that reverted to the land bank as 374 provided under subsection (7). 375 (7)âEach subsequent resale of property acquired by a land 376 bank under this section must comply with the conditions of this 377 subsection. 378 (a)âA land bank must sell a property to a qualified 379 participating developer within 3 years after receiving the deed 380 of conveyance of the property for the purpose of construction of 381 affordable housing for sale or rent to low-income households or 382 very-low-income households. If the land bank has not sold the 383 property within those 3 years, the property must be transferred 384 from the land bank back to the taxing units that were parties to 385 the foreclosure judgment for disposition as otherwise allowed 386 under law. 387 (b)âThe number of properties acquired by a qualified 388 participating developer under this section on which development 389 has not been completed may not at any time exceed three times 390 the annual average residential production completed by the 391 qualified participating developer during the preceding 2-year 392 period, as determined by the governing body of the county or 393 municipality. In its community land bank plan, the governing 394 body of the county or municipality may increase the number of 395 properties a qualified participating developer may acquire. 396 (c)âThe deed conveying a property sold by a land bank must 397 include a right of reverter so that, if the qualified 398 participating developer does not apply for a construction permit 399 and close on any construction financing within 2 years after the 400 date of the conveyance of the property from the land bank to the 401 qualified participating developer, the property reverts to the 402 land bank for subsequent resale to another qualified 403 participating developer or conveyance to the taxing units as 404 required under paragraph (a). 405 (d)âThe proceeds from sales under this section must be 406 reinvested back into the community land bank program. 407 (8)(a)âA land bank must impose deed restrictions on 408 property sold to qualified participating developers requiring 409 the development and sale or rental of the property to low-income 410 households and very-low-income households. 411 (b)âAt least 25 percent of a land bankâs properties sold 412 during any given fiscal year to be developed for sale must be 413 deed restricted for sale to households whose total annual 414 household income does not exceed 60 percent of the area median 415 income, adjusted for household size, for the metropolitan 416 statistical area, or the county if not within a metropolitan 417 statistical area, in which the household is located, as 418 determined annually by the United States Department of Housing 419 and Urban Development. 420 (c)1.âIf the property sold is to be developed for rental 421 units, the deed restrictions must last for at least 20 years and 422 prohibit the exclusion of a person or family from admission to 423 the development based solely on the participation of the person 424 or family in the Housing Choice Voucher Program under s. 8 of 425 the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended. Additionally, 426 the deed restrictions must require: 427 a.âThat 100 percent of the rental units be occupied by and 428 affordable to households whose total annual household income 429 does not exceed 60 percent of the area median income, adjusted 430 for household size, for the metropolitan statistical area, or 431 the county if not within a metropolitan statistical area, in 432 which the household is located, as determined annually by the 433 United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; 434 b.âThat 40 percent of the rental units be occupied by and 435 affordable to households whose total annual household income 436 does not exceed 50 percent of the area median income, adjusted 437 for household size, for the metropolitan statistical area, or 438 the county if not within a metropolitan statistical area, in 439 which the household is located, as determined annually by the 440 United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; or 441 c.âThat 20 percent of the rental units be occupied by and 442 affordable to households whose total annual household income 443 does not exceed 30 percent of the area median income, adjusted 444 for household size, for the metropolitan statistical area, or 445 the county if not within a metropolitan statistical area, in 446 which the household is located, as determined annually by the 447 United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. 448 2.âThe owner of a development with deed restrictions 449 required under this paragraph must file an annual occupancy 450 report with the county or municipality, as applicable, on a form 451 adopted by the governing body of the county or municipality. 452 (d)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, if the 453 deed restrictions imposed under this subsection are for a number 454 of years, the deed restrictions must renew automatically. 455 (e)âA land bank or the governing body of a county or 456 municipality may modify or add to the deed restrictions imposed 457 under this subsection. Any modifications or additions made by 458 the governing body of the county or municipality must be adopted 459 by the governing body as part of its community land bank plan 460 and must comply with the restrictions in this subsection. 461 (9)(a)âA land bank must keep accurate minutes of its 462 meetings and accurate records and books of account that conform 463 with generally accepted accounting principles and that clearly 464 reflect the income and expenses of the land bank and all 465 transactions in relation to its property. 466 (b)âA land bank must maintain in its records for inspection 467 a copy of the sale settlement statement for each property sold 468 by a qualified participating developer and a copy of the first 469 page of the mortgage note with the interest rate and indicating 470 the volume and page number of the instrument as filed with the 471 county clerk. 472 (c)âWithin 90 days after the close of its fiscal year, a 473 land bank must file with the county or municipality, as 474 applicable, an annual audited financial statement prepared by a 475 certified public accountant. The financial transactions of the 476 land bank are subject to audit by the county or municipality. 477 (d)âFor purposes of evaluating the effectiveness of the 478 program, a land bank must submit an annual performance report to 479 the county or municipality, as applicable, by November 1 of each 480 year in which the land bank acquires or sells property under 481 this section. The performance report must include all of the 482 following: 483 1.âA complete and detailed written accounting of all money 484 and properties received and disbursed by the land bank during 485 the preceding fiscal year. 486 2.âFor each property acquired by the land bank during the 487 preceding fiscal year: 488 a.âThe street address of the property. 489 b.âThe legal description of the property. 490 c.âThe date on which the land bank took title to the 491 property. 492 d.âThe full name and street address of the property owner 493 of record at the time of the foreclosure proceeding. 494 3.âFor each property sold by the land bank to a qualified 495 participating developer during the preceding fiscal year: 496 a.âThe street address of the property. 497 b.âThe legal description of the property. 498 c.âThe full name and mailing address of the developer. 499 d.âThe purchase price paid by the developer. 500 e.âThe maximum incomes allowed for the households by the 501 terms of the sale. 502 f.âThe source and amount of any public subsidy provided by 503 the county or municipality to facilitate the sale or rental of 504 the property to a household within the targeted income range. 505 4.âFor each property sold by a qualified participating 506 developer during the preceding fiscal year, the buyerâs 507 household income and a description of all use and sale 508 restrictions. 509 5.âFor each property developed for rental units with an 510 active deed restriction, a copy of the most recent annual report 511 filed by the owner of the land bank. 512 (e)âA land bank must provide copies of the performance 513 report to the taxing units that were parties to the judgment of 514 foreclosure and provide notice of the availability of the 515 performance report for review to the organizations and 516 neighborhood associations identified by the governing body of 517 the county or municipality as serving the neighborhoods in which 518 properties sold to the land bank under this section are located. 519 (f)âThe land bank and county or municipality, as 520 applicable, must maintain copies of all performance reports and 521 make such reports available for public review. 522 (10)âA land bank may acquire real property by donation, 523 devise, purchase, or transfer from a municipality, county, or 524 other governmental entity. Real property acquired under this 525 subsection may be held, managed, and disposed of in accordance 526 with this section and the community land bank plan developed 527 under subsection (3). 528 (11)âExclusive of any state or school district ad valorem 529 tax, up to 75 percent of the taxes collected pursuant to state 530 law on real property conveyed by a land bank must be remitted to 531 the land bank. The allocation of property tax revenues begins in 532 the first taxable year after the date of the conveyance of real 533 property and continues for 5 years. The funds from such property 534 tax revenues must be remitted to the land bank in accordance 535 with the administrative procedures established by the tax 536 commissioner or tax collector of the county or counties in which 537 the land bank is located. 538 (12)âThis section does not apply to property acquired 539 through an eminent domain action. 540 Section 5.âSection 215.55866, Florida Statutes, is created 541 to read: 542 215.55866âUniform home resiliency grading scale and 543 database.â 544 (1)âThe Department of Financial Services shall: 545 (a)âAdopt a uniform home resiliency grading scale to 546 measure the ability of a home to withstand the wind load from a 547 sustained severe tropical storm or hurricane. The grading scale 548 must: 549 1.âBe easy to understand by property owners. 550 2.âUse objective standards and proven mitigation 551 techniques. 552 (b)âCreate a program that facilitates the sharing of 553 information on the resiliency of housing stock using the grading 554 scale created in paragraph (a) through a database maintained by 555 the department. The program must allow insurance companies, 556 mortgage lenders, and others involved in risk financing to 557 access the information. 558 (2)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 559 section. 560 Section 6.âSection 215.55867, Florida Statutes, is created 561 to read: 562 215.55867âInnovative Mitigation Solutions Pilot Program.â 563 (1)âThere is established within the Department of Financial 564 Services the Innovative Mitigation Solutions Pilot Program to 565 allow mortgage lenders and property insurers to develop new 566 financial products to promote and finance mitigation of 567 residential property. 568 (2)âMortgage lenders and property insurers may submit 569 proposals for new financial products to the department. The 570 proposal must include information on any regulatory changes 571 needed for implementation. 572 (3)âThe department may offer a waiver from existing 573 regulations, or develop new regulations, in order to implement 574 the proposal. 575 (4)âThe department shall adopt rules to implement this 576 section. 577 Section 7.âSection 220.1851, Florida Statutes, is created 578 to read: 579 220.1851âRetail-to-residence tax credit.â 580 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 581 (a)ââCredit periodâ means the period of 5 years beginning 582 with the year a project is completed. 583 (b)ââDesignated projectâ means a qualified project 584 designated pursuant to s. 420.50931 to receive the tax credit 585 under this section. 586 (c)ââQualified projectâ means a project to redevelop a 587 structure that was originally developed as a shopping center to 588 provide appropriate and affordable workforce housing. 589 (d)ââShopping centerâ means an area designed to provide 590 space for multiple storefronts within a single building or 591 sharing a common parking lot. 592 (2)(a)âThere shall be allowed a tax credit of up to 9 593 percent, but no more than necessary to make the project 594 feasible, of the total cost of a designated project for each 595 year of the credit period against any tax due for a taxable year 596 under this chapter. 597 (b)âThe tax credit shall be allocated among designated 598 projects by the Florida Housing Finance Corporation as provided 599 in s. 420.50931. 600 (c)âA tax credit allocated to a designated project may be 601 subject to transfer by the recipient. Such transferred credits 602 may not be transferred again. The department shall adopt rules 603 necessary to administer this paragraph. 604 (d)âA tax credit allocation may be used for eligible costs, 605 including, but not limited to, structural modifications, Florida 606 Building Code compliance, utility upgrades, interior 607 reconfigurations, and accessibility improvements, necessary to 608 convert a shopping center into appropriate and affordable 609 workforce housing. 610 (e)âAny unused tax credit allocation may be carried forward 611 for up to 1 fiscal year. 612 Section 8.âSection 420.0005, Florida Statutes, is amended 613 to read: 614 420.0005âState Housing Trust Fund; State Housing Fund.â 615 (1)âThere is established in the State Treasury a separate 616 trust fund to be named the âState Housing Trust Fund.â There 617 shall be deposited in the fund all moneys appropriated by the 618 Legislature, or moneys received from any other source, for the 619 purpose of this chapter, and all proceeds derived from the use 620 of such moneys. The fund shall be administered by the Florida 621 Housing Finance Corporation on behalf of the department, as 622 specified in this chapter. Money deposited to the fund and 623 appropriated by the Legislature must, notwithstanding the 624 provisions of chapter 216 or s. 420.504(3), be transferred 625 quarterly in advance, to the extent available, or, if not so 626 available, as soon as received into the State Housing Trust 627 Fund, and subject to the provisions of s. 420.5092(6)(a) and (b) 628 by the Chief Financial Officer to the corporation upon 629 certification by the Secretary of Commerce that the corporation 630 is in compliance with the requirements of s. 420.0006. The 631 certification made by the secretary shall also include the split 632 of funds among programs administered by the corporation and the 633 department as specified in chapter 92-317, Laws of Florida, as 634 amended. Moneys advanced by the Chief Financial Officer must be 635 deposited by the corporation into a separate fund established 636 with a qualified public depository meeting the requirements of 637 chapter 280 to be named the âState Housing Fundâ and used for 638 the purposes of this chapter. Administrative and personnel costs 639 incurred in implementing this chapter may be paid from the State 640 Housing Fund, but such costs may not exceed 5 percent of the 641 moneys deposited into such fund. To the State Housing Fund shall 642 be credited all loan repayments, penalties, and other fees and 643 charges accruing to such fund under this chapter. It is the 644 intent of this chapter that all loan repayments, penalties, and 645 other fees and charges collected be credited in full to the 646 program account from which the loan originated. Moneys in the 647 State Housing Fund which are not currently needed for the 648 purposes of this chapter shall be invested in such manner as is 649 provided for by statute. The interest received on any such 650 investment shall be credited to the State Housing Fund. 651 (2)âFor any funds transferred from the State Housing Trust 652 Fund in accordance with s. 215.32: 653 (a)âAn agency receiving funds that originated from the 654 State Housing Trust Fund must provide a report to the 655 Legislature identifying with specificity the manner in which the 656 funds were spent. The report must be submitted within 30 days 657 after the close of the fiscal year in which the funds are 658 expended. 659 (b)âAny funds appropriated from the State Housing Trust 660 Fund for uses other than those specified in this chapter must be 661 repaid within 5 years after the date on which the funds were 662 appropriated. 663 Section 9.âSection 420.50931, Florida Statutes, is created 664 to read: 665 420.50931âRetail-to-Residence Tax Credit Program.â 666 (1)âThere is created the Retail-to-Residence Tax Credit 667 Program for the purpose of redeveloping shopping centers into 668 appropriate and affordable workforce housing. 669 (2)âThe corporation shall determine those qualified 670 projects, as defined in s. 220.1851(1), which shall be 671 considered designated projects under s. 220.1851 and eligible 672 for the corporate tax credit under that section. The corporation 673 shall establish procedures necessary for proper allocation and 674 distribution of tax credits, including the establishment of 675 criteria for ensuring that the housing is appropriate and 676 affordable for the workers of this state, and may exercise all 677 powers necessary to administer the allocation of such credits. 678 The board of directors of the corporation shall administer the 679 allocation procedures and determine allocations on behalf of the 680 corporation. The corporation shall prepare an annual plan, which 681 must be approved by the Governor, containing general guidelines 682 for the allocation of tax credits to designated projects. 683 (3)âThe corporation shall adopt allocation procedures to 684 ensure that tax credits are used in a fair manner, taking into 685 consideration the timeliness of the application, the location of 686 the proposed project, the relative need in the area for 687 appropriate and affordable workforce housing and the 688 availability of such housing, the economic feasibility of the 689 proposed project, and the ability of the applicant to complete 690 the proposed project in the calendar year for which the tax 691 credit is sought. 692 (4)(a)âA taxpayer who wishes to participate in the Retail 693 to-Residence Tax Credit Program must submit an application for 694 tax credit to the corporation. The application must identify the 695 proposed project and the location of the proposed project and 696 include evidence that the proposed project is a qualified 697 project as defined in s. 220.1851(1). The corporation may 698 request any information from an applicant necessary to enable 699 the corporation to make tax credit allocations according to the 700 procedures adopted under subsection (3). 701 (b)âThe corporationâs approval of an application for a 702 project must be in writing and include a statement of the 703 maximum tax credit allowable to the applicant. 704 Section 10.âSection 420.5312, Florida Statutes, is created 705 to read: 706 420.5312âAffordable Housing Construction Loan Program.â 707 (1)âThe Affordable Housing Construction Loan Program is 708 created to encourage the new construction of affordable homes 709 for purchase by low- to moderate-income homebuyers by providing 710 a revolving line of construction funding. 711 (2)âThe corporation is authorized to provide loans under 712 the program to applicants for the construction of affordable 713 housing. Applicants may draw from the loan up to five times per 714 home. All homes must meet the requirements of the Florida 715 Building Code or, if more stringent, local amendments to the 716 Florida Building Code. 717 (3)âQualified homebuyers of homes built under this program 718 must be first-time homebuyers whose total annual household 719 income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median income, 720 adjusted for household size, for the metropolitan statistical 721 area, or the county if not within a metropolitan statistical 722 area, in which the household is located, as determined annually 723 by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 724 Development. 725 (4)âThe corporation shall develop a loan application 726 process for the program. 727 (5)âThe corporation may adopt rules pursuant to ss. 728 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this section. 729 Section 11.âSection 420.9079, Florida Statutes, is amended 730 to read: 731 420.9079âLocal Government Housing Trust Fund.â 732 (1)âThere is created in the State Treasury the Local 733 Government Housing Trust Fund, which shall be administered by 734 the corporation on behalf of the department according to the 735 provisions of ss. 420.907-420.9076 and this section. There shall 736 be deposited into the fund a portion of the documentary stamp 737 tax revenues as provided in s. 201.15, moneys received from any 738 other source for the purposes of ss. 420.907-420.9076 and this 739 section, and all proceeds derived from the investment of such 740 moneys. Moneys in the fund that are not currently needed for the 741 purposes of the programs administered pursuant to ss. 420.907 742 420.9076 and this section shall be deposited to the credit of 743 the fund and may be invested as provided by law. The interest 744 received on any such investment shall be credited to the fund. 745 (2)âThe corporation shall administer the fund exclusively 746 for the purpose of implementing the programs described in ss. 747 420.907-420.9076 and this section. With the exception of 748 monitoring the activities of counties and eligible 749 municipalities to determine local compliance with program 750 requirements, the corporation shall not receive appropriations 751 from the fund for administrative or personnel costs. For the 752 purpose of implementing the compliance monitoring provisions of 753 s. 420.9075(9), the corporation may request a maximum of one 754 quarter of 1 percent of the annual appropriation per state 755 fiscal year. When such funding is appropriated, the corporation 756 shall deduct the amount appropriated before prior to calculating 757 the local housing distribution pursuant to ss. 420.9072 and 758 420.9073. 759 (3)âFor any funds transferred from the Local Government 760 Housing Trust Fund in accordance with s. 215.32: 761 (a)âAn agency receiving funds that originated from the 762 Local Government Housing Trust Fund must provide a report to the 763 Legislature identifying with specificity the manner in which the 764 funds were spent. The report must be submitted within 30 days 765 after the close of the fiscal year in which the funds are 766 expended. 767 (b)âAny funds appropriated from the Local Government 768 Housing Trust Fund for uses other than those specified in this 769 chapter must be repaid within 5 years after the date on which 770 the funds were appropriated. 771 Section 12.âSection 542.37, Florida Statutes, is created to 772 read: 773 542.37âUnlawful restriction of competition with respect to 774 residential dwelling units.â 775 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 776 (a)ââConsciously parallel pricing coordinationâ means a 777 tacit agreement between two or more landlords to raise, lower, 778 change, maintain, or manipulate pricing for the rental of a 779 residential dwelling unit. 780 (b)ââCoordinating functionâ means all of the following: 781 1.âCollecting historical or contemporaneous prices, supply 782 levels, or rental agreement termination and renewal dates of 783 residential dwelling units from two or more landlords. 784 2.âAnalyzing or processing the information described in 785 subparagraph 1. through the use of a system or process or 786 through software that uses computation, including by using the 787 information to train an algorithm. 788 3.âRecommending rental prices, rental agreement renewal 789 terms, or ideal occupancy levels to a landlord. 790 (c)ââCoordinatorâ means a person who operates a software or 791 data analytics service that performs a coordinating function for 792 a landlord. The term includes a landlord if such person is 793 performing a coordinating function for his or her own benefit. 794 (d)ââLandlordâ means a residential property owner or lessor 795 of a residential dwelling unit. 796 (e)ââResidential dwelling unitâ means a house, an 797 apartment, an accessory unit, or any other unit intended to be 798 used as a primary residence in this state. The term does not 799 include inpatient medical care, licensed long-term care, or 800 detention or correctional facilities. 801 (2)âIt is unlawful and a violation of the Florida Antitrust 802 Act of 1980 for: 803 (a)âA landlord, or the agent, representative, or 804 subcontractor of the landlord, to subscribe to, contract with, 805 or otherwise exchange any form of consideration in return for 806 the use of the services of a coordinator; 807 (b)âA coordinator to facilitate an agreement among 808 landlords which restricts competition with respect to 809 residential dwelling units, including by performing a 810 coordinating function; or 811 (c)âTwo or more landlords to engage in consciously parallel 812 pricing coordination. 813 (3)âSections 542.21, 542.22, 542.23, 542.24-542.32, and 814 542.35 apply to this section. 815 (4)âThe Office of the Attorney General shall develop a 816 public education program designed to inform residents of this 817 state of the prohibitions in this section. Information developed 818 for the public education program must be posted on the Attorney 819 Generalâs website along with information on the steps a consumer 820 may take if the consumer suspects a violation of this section. 821 (5)âThe Office of the Attorney General may adopt rules to 822 implement this section. 823 Section 13.âSubsections (5) and (6) are added to section 824 627.0613, Florida Statutes, to read: 825 627.0613âConsumer advocate.âThe Chief Financial Officer 826 must appoint a consumer advocate who must represent the general 827 public of the state before the department and the office. The 828 consumer advocate must report directly to the Chief Financial 829 Officer, but is not otherwise under the authority of the 830 department or of any employee of the department. The consumer 831 advocate has such powers as are necessary to carry out the 832 duties of the office of consumer advocate, including, but not 833 limited to, the powers to: 834 (5)âRequest an administrative hearing pursuant to s. 120.57 835 to challenge a notice of intent to approve or a notice of intent 836 to disapprove a rate filing. 837 (6)âAdminister oaths or affirmations to compel the 838 attendance and testimony of witnesses, or to issue subpoenas for 839 and compel the production of books, papers, records, documents, 840 and other evidence, pertaining to any investigation or hearing 841 convened under this section. 842 (a)âIn conducting an investigation, the consumer advocate 843 and its investigators must have access at all reasonable times 844 to premises, records, documents, and other evidence or possible 845 sources of evidence and may examine, record, and copy such 846 materials and take and record the testimony or statements of 847 such persons as deemed reasonably necessary for the furtherance 848 of the investigation. 849 (b)âIn the case of a refusal to obey a subpoena issued to 850 any person, the consumer advocate may apply to any circuit court 851 of this state, which court shall have jurisdiction to order the 852 witness to appear before the consumer advocate to give testimony 853 and to produce evidence concerning the matter in question. 854 Failure to obey the courtâs order may be punished by the court 855 as contempt. If the court enters an order holding a person in 856 contempt or compelling the person to comply with the subpoena, 857 the court may order the person to pay the consumer advocate 858 reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, accrued 859 by the consumer advocate in obtaining the order from the court. 860 Section 14.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) and subsection 861 (6) of section 627.062, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 862 627.062âRate standards.â 863 (2)âAs to all such classes of insurance: 864 (a)âInsurers or rating organizations shall establish and 865 use rates, rating schedules, or rating manuals that allow the 866 insurer a reasonable rate of return on the classes of insurance 867 written in this state. A copy of rates, rating schedules, rating 868 manuals, premium credits or discount schedules, and surcharge 869 schedules, and changes thereto, must be filed with the office 870 under one of the following procedures: 871 1.âIf the filing is made at least 90 days before the 872 proposed effective date and is not implemented during the 873 officeâs review of the filing and any proceeding and judicial 874 review, such filing is considered a âfile and useâ filing. In 875 such case, the office shall finalize its review by issuance of a 876 notice of intent to approve or a notice of intent to disapprove 877 within 90 days after receipt of the filing. If the 90-day period 878 ends on a weekend or a holiday under s. 110.117(1)(a)-(i), it 879 must be extended until the conclusion of the next business day. 880 The notice of intent to approve and the notice of intent to 881 disapprove constitute agency action for purposes of the 882 Administrative Procedure Act. Requests for supporting 883 information, requests for mathematical or mechanical 884 corrections, or notification to the insurer by the office of its 885 preliminary findings does not toll the 90-day period during any 886 such proceedings and subsequent judicial review. The rate shall 887 be deemed approved if the office does not issue a notice of 888 intent to approve or a notice of intent to disapprove within 90 889 days after receipt of the filing. 890 2.âIf the filing is not made in accordance with 891 subparagraph 1., such filing must be made as soon as 892 practicable, but within 30 days after the effective date, and is 893 considered a âuse and fileâ filing. An insurer making a âuse and 894 fileâ filing is potentially subject to an order by the office to 895 return to policyholders those portions of rates found to be 896 excessive, as provided in paragraph (h). 897 3.âFor all property insurance filings made or submitted 898 after January 25, 2007, but before May 1, 2012, an insurer 899 seeking a rate that is greater than the rate most recently 900 approved by the office shall make a âfile and useâ filing. For 901 purposes of this subparagraph, motor vehicle collision and 902 comprehensive coverages are not considered property coverages. 903 4.âThe office may not approve any property insurance 904 filings made or submitted on or after July 1, 2026, if the 905 proposed rate is more than 10 percent above the highest rate 906 approved by the office within the past 12 months. If multiple 907 rate filings occur within a 12-month period, the office may not 908 approve a total cumulative increase that is more than 15 percent 909 above the highest approved rate within the past 12 months. 910 911 The provisions of this subsection do not apply to workersâ 912 compensation, employerâs liability insurance, and motor vehicle 913 insurance. 914 (6)(a)âIf an insurer or the consumer advocate under s. 915 627.0613 requests an administrative hearing pursuant to s. 916 120.57 related to a rate filing under this section, the director 917 of the Division of Administrative Hearings must shall expedite 918 the hearing and assign an administrative law judge who shall 919 commence the hearing within 30 days after the receipt of the 920 formal request and enter a recommended order within 30 days 921 after the hearing or within 30 days after receipt of the hearing 922 transcript by the administrative law judge, whichever is later. 923 Each party shall have 10 days in which to submit written 924 exceptions to the recommended order. The office shall enter a 925 final order within 30 days after the entry of the recommended 926 order. The provisions of this paragraph may be waived upon 927 stipulation of all parties. 928 (b)âUpon entry of a final order, the insurer or the 929 consumer advocate under s. 627.0613 may request an expedited 930 appellate review pursuant to the Florida Rules of Appellate 931 Procedure. It is the intent of the Legislature that the First 932 District Court of Appeal grant an insurerâs or the consumer 933 advocateâs request for an expedited appellate review. 934 Section 15.âSection 692.041, Florida Statutes, is created 935 to read: 936 692.041âSingle-family residential property.â 937 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 938 (a)ââAffiliateâ means: 939 1.âA person or business entity that directly or indirectly 940 controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with 941 another person or business entity, including, but not limited 942 to, any heirs, assigns, related trusts, or persons who are in 943 privity of contract at law or in equity. 944 2.âA person or business entity that receives a financial 945 benefit from possession of the land as an asset, including, but 946 not limited to, income, leverage, capital securitization, 947 inclusion in a financial portfolio, or for purposes related to 948 debt or taxes. 949 950 As used in this paragraph, the term âcontrolâ means the direct 951 or indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the 952 management or policies of a business entity, whether through 953 ownership, common management, contractual arrangements, or 954 otherwise. 955 (b)ââBusiness entityâ means an association, a company, a 956 firm, a partnership, a corporation, a limited liability company, 957 a limited liability partnership, a real estate investment trust, 958 or any other legal entity, and such entityâs successors, 959 assignees, or affiliates. The term does not include: 960 1.âA nonprofit corporation or other nonprofit legal entity. 961 2.âA person or entity primarily engaged in the acquisition, 962 rehabilitation, or construction of new or existing market rate 963 or affordable residential housing. As used in this subparagraph, 964 the term âaffordableâ has the same meaning as in s. 420.0004. 965 (c)ââSingle-family residential propertyâ means a single 966 parcel of real property improved with only one detached dwelling 967 unit on it for which a certificate of occupancy has been issued. 968 (2)(a)âA business entity that has an interest in more than 969 100 single-family residential properties in this state may not 970 purchase, acquire, or otherwise obtain an ownership interest in 971 another single-family residential property and subsequently 972 lease or rent such property. 973 (b)âThe seller of single-family residential property to a 974 business entity is not liable for any violation of this section 975 by the business entity. 976 (3)(a)âBeginning July 1, 2026, a business entity that has 977 an interest in 1000 or more single-family residential properties 978 may not purchase, acquire, or offer to purchase or acquire any 979 interest in another single-family residential property unless 980 such property has been listed for sale to the general public for 981 at least 90 days. The 90-day waiting period restarts if the 982 seller of the single-family residential property changes the 983 asking price of such property. 984 (b)âIf a business entity described in paragraph (a) 985 purchases or acquires an interest in a single-family residential 986 property, the business entity, or its authorized agent, must 987 complete and retain the following notice at the time a contract 988 for purchase is executed: 989 990 COMPLIANCE WITH FLORIDA LAW 991 Under s. 692.041, Florida Statutes, a business entity 992 that has an interest in 1000 or more single-family 993 residential properties may not purchase, acquire, or 994 offer to purchase or acquire any interest in another 995 single-family residential property unless such 996 property has been listed for sale to the general 997 public for at least 90 days. The undersigned certifies 998 compliance with this requirement. 999 1000 (c)âA business entity shall retain the signed notice under 1001 paragraph (b) for inspection, upon request, by the Department of 1002 Legal Affairs. 1003 (4)(a)âFor purposes of determining compliance with this 1004 section, all ownership interests held by a business entity, 1005 together with those held by any affiliates of the business 1006 entity, must be aggregated and treated as if such ownership 1007 interests are held by a single business entity. 1008 (b)âA business entity may not use affiliated entities or 1009 other similar arrangements to avoid the application of this 1010 section. 1011 (5)âThe Attorney General may bring a civil action for a 1012 violation of this section. If the Attorney General prevails in a 1013 civil action brought under this section, the court must order 1014 all of the following: 1015 (a)1.âA civil penalty of $100,000 against the business 1016 entity for each violation of paragraph (2)(a); or 1017 2.âA civil penalty of up to $10,000 against the business 1018 entity for each violation of subsection (3). 1019 (b)âRequire the business entity to sell the single-family 1020 residential property to a natural person or an independent third 1021 party within 1 year after the date the court enters the 1022 judgment. 1023 (c)âReasonable attorney fees and costs. 1024 (6)âSubsection (5) is the exclusive remedy for a violation 1025 of this section. 1026 Section 16.âPresent subsections (6), (7), and (8) of 1027 section 83.67, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections 1028 (7), (8), and (9), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is 1029 added to that section, to read: 1030 83.67âProhibited practices.â 1031 (6)âA landlord of any dwelling unit governed by this part 1032 may not use the services of a coordinator or engage in 1033 consciously parallel pricing coordination, as those terms are 1034 defined in s. 542.37(1). 1035 Section 17.âSection 542.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1036 read: 1037 542.21âPenalties for violation.â 1038 (1)âAny natural person who violates any of the provisions 1039 of s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37 is shall be subject to 1040 a civil penalty of not more than $100,000. Any other person who 1041 violates any of the provisions of s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 1042 542.37 is shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than 1043 $1 million. 1044 (2)âAny person who knowingly violates any of the provisions 1045 of s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37, or who knowingly aids 1046 in or advises such violation, is guilty of a felony, punishable 1047 by a fine not exceeding $1 million if a corporation, or, if any 1048 other person, $100,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years, or 1049 by both said punishments. 1050 (3)âThe commencement of trial seeking civil penalties in 1051 any action under this section bars shall bar any subsequent 1052 criminal prosecution against the same person for violation of s. 1053 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37, based upon the same acts. 1054 The commencement of trial in a criminal prosecution for a 1055 violation of s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37 bars shall 1056 bar any subsequent action against the same person for recovery 1057 of civil penalties under this section based upon the same acts, 1058 but may shall not bar a subsequent suit for damages or 1059 injunctive relief under ss. 542.22 and 542.23. 1060 (4)âThe Attorney General may not commence an No action 1061 under this section or s. 542.23 shall be commenced by the 1062 Attorney General against any person who, at the time, is a 1063 defendant in a suit filed by the United States for violation or 1064 alleged violation of the federal antitrust laws involving 1065 substantially the same subject matter and seeking substantially 1066 the same relief. 1067 Section 18.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 542.22, 1068 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1069 542.22âSuits for damages.â 1070 (1)âAny person who is shall be injured in her or his 1071 business or property by reason of any violation of s. 542.18, or 1072 s. 542.19, or s. 542.37 may sue therefor in the circuit courts 1073 of this state and shall recover threefold the damages by her or 1074 him sustained, and the cost of suit, including a reasonable 1075 attorney fee. The court shall award a reasonable attorney fee to 1076 a defendant prevailing in any action under this part for damages 1077 or equitable relief in which the court finds there was a 1078 complete absence of a justiciable issue of either law or fact 1079 raised by the plaintiff. 1080 (2)âThe Attorney General, or a state attorney after 1081 receiving written permission from the Attorney General, may 1082 bring a civil action in the name of this the state, as parens 1083 patriae on behalf of natural persons residing in this state, to 1084 recover on behalf of those persons threefold the actual damages 1085 sustained by reason of any violation of s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, 1086 or s. 542.37, and the cost of such suit, including a reasonable 1087 attorney attorneyâs fee. The court shall exclude from the amount 1088 of monetary relief awarded in such action any amount of monetary 1089 relief which: 1090 (a)âDuplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same 1091 injury; 1092 (b)âIs properly allocable to natural persons who have 1093 excluded their claims pursuant to paragraph (3)(b); or 1094 (c)âIs properly allocable to any business entity. 1095 Section 19.âSection 542.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1096 read: 1097 542.25âJudgment in favor of state as prima facie evidence. 1098 A final judgment or decree entered in any civil or criminal 1099 proceeding brought by the Attorney General or a state attorney 1100 under s. 542.21 or s. 542.23 to the effect that a defendant has 1101 violated s. 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37, or entered in 1102 any civil or criminal proceeding brought by the United States 1103 Department of Justice under comparable federal laws, shall be 1104 prima facie evidence against such defendant in any civil action 1105 or proceeding under this part brought by any other person 1106 against such defendant as to all matters with respect to which 1107 such judgment or decree would be an estoppel as between the 1108 parties thereto; however, this section does not apply to a 1109 consent judgment or decree entered before any testimony has been 1110 taken. Nothing contained in This section may not shall be 1111 construed to impose any limitation on the application of 1112 collateral estoppel. 1113 Section 20.âSection 542.32, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1114 read: 1115 542.32âRule of construction and coverage.âIt is the intent 1116 of the Legislature that, in construing this part, due 1117 consideration and great weight be given to the interpretations 1118 of the federal courts relating to comparable federal antitrust 1119 statutes. In particular, the failure to include in this part the 1120 substantive provisions of s. 3 of the Clayton Act, 15 U.S.C. s. 1121 14, may shall not be deemed in any way to limit the scope of s. 1122 542.18, or s. 542.19, or s. 542.37. 1123 Section 21.â This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.